Utah statutes.
78B-7-107.   Hearings on ex parte orders.
(1) (a)  When a court issues an ex parte protective order the court shall set
a date for a hearing on the petition within 20 days after the ex parte order
is issued.
(b)  If at that hearing the court does not issue a protective order, the ex
parte protective order shall expire, unless it is otherwise extended by the
court.  Extensions beyond the 20-day period may not by granted unless:
(i)  the petitioner is unable to be present at the hearing;
(ii)  the respondent has not been served;
(iii)  the respondent has had the opportunity to present a defense at the
hearing;
(iv)  the respondent requests that the ex parte order be extended; or
(v)  exigent circumstances exist.
(c)  Under no circumstances may an ex parte order be extended beyond 180 days
from the date of initial issuance.
(d)  If at that hearing the court issues a protective order, the ex parte
protective order remains in effect until service of process of the protective
order is completed.
(e)  A protective order issued after notice and a hearing is effective until
further order of the court.
(f)  If the hearing on the petition is heard by a commissioner, either the
petitioner or respondent may file an objection within 10 days of the entry of
the recommended order and the assigned judge shall hold a hearing within 20
days of the filing of the objection.
(2)  Upon a hearing under this section, the court may grant any of the relief
described in Section 78B-7-106.
(3)  When a court denies a petition for an ex parte protective order or a
petition to  modify an order for protection ex parte, the court shall set the
matter for hearing upon notice to the respondent.
(4)  A respondent who has been served with an ex parte protective order may
seek to vacate the ex parte protective order prior to the hearing scheduled
pursuant to Subsection (1)(a) by filing a verified motion to vacate.  The
respondent's verified motion to vacate and a notice of hearing on that motion
shall be personally served on the petitioner at least two days prior to the
hearing on the motion to vacate.
